Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5383.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-15-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-15 entitled "Primary
Elections" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-15-1. Date of primaries.
A primary election for the nomination of candidates for each political party shall be held
in each voting district in the manner provided in this chapter on the eighth Tuesday preceding
biennial state elections. Provided, however, that if the eighth Tuesday is the day after Labor Day,
then the primary election shall be held on the very next day, the Wednesday.
SECTION 2. Section 17-9.1-4.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-9.1 entitled
"Registration of Voters" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-9.1-4.1. Registration drives at high schools.
It shall may be the duty of local boards to annually conduct a voter registration drive at
each high school within the city or town in cooperation with the administration of the schools. Each
principal of every public or private high school and director of each vocational school in this state
may be a registration agent whose authority shall be limited to receiving and accepting registrations
as electors from those qualified applicants who are enrolled as students within the school or are
employed within the school. The principal or director may designate one or more persons in the
school to serve as registration agents with the same authority as the principal of the school, provided
each designation is filed with the local board for the city or town in which the school is located.
Each person who is a registration agent pursuant to this section shall be sworn to the faithful

performance of his or her duties and shall be subject to removal as a registration agent by the local
board for cause shown. All registration made under this section shall be made in accordance with
rules and regulations established by the local board of the city or town in which the school is
located.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000828
========
LC000828 - Page 2 of 3